Utah, session 2026, SB93.
Section 1. Section 64-13-1 is amended to read:64-13-1. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Behavioral health transition facility" means a nonsecure correctional facility operated by the department for the purpose of providing a therapeutic environment for offenders receiving mental health services.(2)"Case action plan" means a document developed by the Department of Corrections that identifies:(a)the program priorities for the treatment of the offender, including the criminal risk factors as determined by risk, needs, and responsivity assessments conducted by the department; and(b)clearly defined completion requirements.(3)"Community correctional center" means a nonsecure correctional facility operated by the department, but does not include a behavioral health transition facility for the purposes of Section 64-13f-103.(4)"Correctional facility" means any facility operated to house offenders in a secure or nonsecure setting:(a)by the department; or(b)under a contract with the department.(5)"Criminal risk factors" means an individual's characteristics and behaviors that:(a)affect the individual's risk of engaging in criminal behavior; and(b)are diminished when addressed by effective treatment, supervision, and other support resources, resulting in a reduced risk of criminal behavior.(6)"Department" means the Department of Corrections.(7)"Direct supervision" means a housing and supervision system that is designed to meet the goals described in Subsection 64-13-14(5) and has the elements described in Subsection 64-13-14(6).(8)(7)"Emergency" means any riot, disturbance, homicide, inmate violence occurring in any correctional facility, or any situation that presents immediate danger to the safety, security, and control of the department.(9)(8)"Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had multiple randomized control studies or a meta-analysis demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for a specific population or has been rated as effective by a standardized program evaluation tool.(10)(9)"Evidence-informed" means a program or practice that is based on research and the experience and expertise of the department.(11)(10)"Executive director" means the executive director of the Department of Corrections.(12)(11)"Inmate" means an individual who is:(a)committed to the custody of the department; and(b)housed at a correctional facility or at a county jail at the request of the department.(13)(12)"Offender" means an individual who has been convicted of a crime for which the individual may be committed to the custody of the department and is at least one of the following:(a)committed to the custody of the department;(b)on probation; or(c)on parole.(14)(13)"Recidivism" means a return to criminal activity after a previous criminal conviction.(15)(14)"Restitution" means the same as that term is defined in Section 77-38b-102.(16)(15)"Risk and needs assessment" means an actuarial tool validated on criminal offenders that determines:(a)an individual's risk of reoffending; and(b)the criminal risk factors that, when addressed, reduce the individual's risk of reoffending.(17)(16)"Secure correctional facility" means any prison, penitentiary, or other institution operated by the department or under contract for the confinement of offenders, where force may be used to restrain an offender if the offender attempts to leave the institution without authorization.(18)(17)"Serious illness" means, as determined by the inmate's physician, an illness that substantially impairs the inmate's quality of life.(19)(18)"Serious injury" means, as determined by the inmate's physician, bodily injury that involves a substantial risk of death, prolonged unconsciousness, prolonged and obvious disfigurement, or prolonged loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ, or mental faculty.(20)(19)"State-issued driver license" means a driver license issued in accordance with Title 53, Chapter 3, Part 2, Driver Licensing Act, or an equivalent issued by another state.(21)(20)"State-issued identification card" means an identification card issued in accordance with Title 53, Chapter 3, Part 8, Identification Card Act, or an equivalent issued by another state.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 64-13-6 is amended to read:64-13-6. Department duties.(1)The department shall:(a)protect the public through institutional care and confinement, and supervision in the community of offenders where appropriate;(b)implement court-ordered punishment of offenders;(c)provide evidence-based and evidence-informed program opportunities for offenders designed to reduce offenders' criminogenic and recidivism risks, including behavioral, cognitive, educational, and career-readiness program opportunities;(d)ensure that offender participation in all program opportunities described in Subsection (1)(c) is voluntary;(e)where appropriate, utilize offender volunteers as mentors in the program opportunities described in Subsection (1)(c);(f)provide treatment for sex offenders who are found to be treatable based upon criteria developed by the department;(g)provide the results of ongoing clinical assessment of sex offenders and objective diagnostic testing to sentencing and release authorities;(h)manage programs that take into account the needs and interests of victims, where reasonable;(i)through the Division of Adult Probation and Parole created in Section 64-14-202, supervise probationers and parolees as directed by statute and implemented by the courts and the Board of Pardons and Parole;(j)subject to Subsection (2), investigate criminal conduct involving offenders incarcerated in a state correctional facility;(k)cooperate and exchange information with other state, local, and federal law enforcement agencies to achieve greater success in prevention and detection of crime and apprehension of criminals;(l)implement the provisions of Title 77, Chapter 28c, Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision;(m)establish a case action plan based on appropriate validated risk, needs, and responsivity assessments for each offender as follows:(i)(A)if an offender is to be supervised in the community, the department shall establish a case action plan for the offender no later than 60 days after the day on which the department's community supervision of the offender begins; and(B)if the offender is committed to the custody of the department, the department shall establish a case action plan for the offender no later than 90 days after the day on which the offender is committed to the custody of the department;(ii)each case action plan shall:(A)integrate an individualized, evidence-based, and evidence-informed treatment and program plan with clearly defined completion requirements; and(B)require that a case manager will:(I)ensure that an assessment of the education level, occupational interests, and aptitudes of the inmate has been completed;(II)refer the inmate to a higher education student advisor at an institution offering programs consistent with the inmate's interests and aptitudes for advisement on educational preferences and plans;(III)incorporate the inmate's interests, aptitudes, and student advisement into an education plan consistent with the guidance provided by the Higher Education and Corrections Council created in Section 53H-1-604; and(IV)refer the inmate to the student advisor at the institution called for in the case action plan for guidance and assistance with the education process;(iii)the department shall share each newly established case action plan with the sentencing and release authority within 30 days after the day on which the case action plan is established; and(iv)the department shall share any changes to a case action plan, including any change in an offender's risk assessment, with the sentencing and release authority within 30 days after the day of the change;(n)ensure that an inmate has reasonable access to legal research;(o)ensure that any training or certification required of a public official or public employee, as those terms are defined in Section 63G-22-102, complies with Title 63G, Chapter 22, State Training and Certification Requirements, if the training or certification is required:(i)under this title;(ii)by the department; or(iii)by an agency or division within the department;(p)when reporting on statewide recidivism, include the metrics and requirements described in Section 63M-7-102;(q)create a reentry division that focuses on the successful reentry of inmates into the community, which shall include:(i)screening and assessments for an inmate's risks and needs;(ii)individualized plans and case management;(iii)quality treatment, education, and job preparation;(iv)community partnerships; and(v)comprehensive release planning before the inmate's release, including:(A)coordination with support services; and(B)coordination with one or more family members or friends, if the inmate has given permission to contact specific individuals for this purpose;(r)coordinate with the Board of Pardons and Parole regarding inmate records that are necessary for the Board of Pardons and Parole to make necessary determinations regarding an inmate; and(s)ensure that inmate records regarding discipline, programs, and other relevant metrics are:(i)complete and updated in a timely manner; and(ii)when applicable, shared with the Board of Pardons and Parole in a timely manner.(2)In accordance with department policy, the department may conduct criminal investigations regarding an allegation that:(a)an offender has committed a criminal offense; or(b)an employee of the department has committed a criminal offense.(3)(a)The executive director of the department, or the executive director's designee if the designee possesses expertise in correctional programming, shall consult at least annually with cognitive and career-readiness staff experts from the Utah system of higher education and the State Board of Education to review the department's evidence-based and evidence-informed treatment and program opportunities.(b)Beginning in the 2022 interim, the department shall provide an annual report to the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee regarding:(i)the department's implementation of and offender participation in evidence-based and evidence-informed treatment and program opportunities designed to reduce the criminogenic and recidivism risks of offenders over time; and(ii)the progress of the department's implementation of the inmate program requirements described in Section 64-13-50.(4)(a)As used in this Subsection (4):(i)(A)"Accounts receivable" means any amount owed by an offender arising from a criminal judgment that has not been paid.(ii)(B)"Accounts receivable" includes unpaid fees, overpayments, fines, forfeitures, surcharges, costs, interest, penalties, restitution to victims, third-party claims, claims, reimbursement of a reward, and damages that an offender is ordered to pay.(C)"Accounts receivable" does not include unpaid supervision fees.(ii)"Supervision fee" means the monthly fee collected under Subsection 64-14-204(6) from an offender on probation or parole by the Division of Adult Probation and Parole created in Section 64-14-202.(b)The department shall collect and disburse, with any interest and any other costs assessed under Section 64-14-204, an accounts receivable for an offender during:(i)the parole period and any extension of that period in accordance with Subsection (4)(c); and(ii)the probation period for which the court orders supervised probation and any extension of that period by the department in accordance with Subsection 77-18-105(7).(c)(i)If an offender has an unpaid balance of the offender's accounts receivable at the time that the offender's sentence expires or terminates, the department shall be referred to the sentencing court for the sentencing court to enter a civil judgment of restitution and a civil accounts receivable as described in Section 77-18-114.(ii)If the board makes an order for restitution within 60 days from the day on which the offender's sentence expires or terminates, the board shall refer the order for restitution to the sentencing court to be entered as a civil judgment of restitution as described in Section 77-18-114.(d)This Subsection (4) only applies to offenders sentenced before July 1, 2021.(5)(a)The department may procure or adopt technology services to facilitate the coordination of services and enhance accountability with agencies, local partners, and community-based organizations that are involved with assisting individuals on probation or parole.(b)If possible, the technology services described in Subsection (5)(a) shall:(i)maintain a single, secure client record with a unique identifier to ensure seamless coordination and reduce duplication of services;(ii)notify authorized users of incoming service requests or referrals;(iii)provide secure access to information necessary to understanding and addressing the needs of an individual, including the individual's service and care history;(iv)allow authorized users to exchange information with referring or collaborating organizations through a secure and live chat feature; and(v)send and track individual referrals, store referral outcomes, and document services provided.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 64-13-14 is amended to read:64-13-14. Secure correctional facilities.(1)The department shall maintain and operate secure correctional facilities for the incarceration of offenders.(2)For each compound of secure correctional facilities, as established by the executive director, wardens shall be appointed as the chief administrative officers by the executive director.(3)The department may transfer offenders from one correctional facility to another and may, with the consent of the sheriff, transfer any offender to a county jail.(4)Where new or modified facilities are designed appropriately, the department shallmay implement an evidence-based direct supervision system in accordance with Subsections (5) and (6)Subsection (5).(5)A If the department chooses to implement a direct supervision system in accordance with Subsection (4), the direct supervision system shall:(a) be designed to meet the goals of:(a)(i)reducing offender violence;(b)(ii)enhancing offenders' participation in treatment, program, and work opportunities;(c)(iii)managing and reducing offender risk;(d)(iv)promoting pro-social offender behaviors;(e)(v)providing a tiered-housing structure that:(i)(A)rewards an offender's pro-social behaviors and progress toward the completion requirements of the offender's individual case action plan with less restrictive housing and increased privileges; and(ii)(B)houses similarly behaving offenders together; and(f)(vi)reducing departmental costs.; and(6)(b)A direct supervision system shall include the following elements:(a)(i)department staff will interact continuously with offenders to actively manage offenders' behavior and to identify problems at early stages;(b)(ii)department staff will use management techniques designed to prevent and discourage negative offender behavior and encourage positive offender behavior;(c)(iii)department staff will establish and maintain a professional supervisory relationship with offenders; and(d)(iv)barriers separating department staff and offenders shall be removed.(7)(a)Notwithstanding Subsection (4), the department may implement a supervision model other than the direct supervision model described in Subsection (4) if the executive director:(i)determines that the direct supervision model endangers:(A)the health and safety of the inmates or correctional facility staff; or(B)the security of the correctional facility; and(ii)creates a policy detailing what the supervision model will be and why that model will increase the health and safety of the inmates or correctional facility staff or the security of the correctional facility over a direct supervision model.(b)The department shall post on the department's website:(i)the executive director's determinations regarding the dangers of using a direct supervision model as described in Subsection (7)(a)(i); and(ii)the policy detailing the supervision model to be used as described in Subsection (7)(a)(ii).(8)The department shall provide an annual report to the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee regarding: (a)the status of the implementation of direct supervision; and(b)if applicable, the implementation of a supervision model other than the direct supervision model as described in Subsection (7).

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 64-13-24 is amended to read:64-13-24. Standards for staff training.(1)To assure the safe and professional operation of correctional programs, the department shall establish policies setting minimum standards for the basic training of all staff upon employment, and the subsequent regular training of staff, including training on directappropriate supervision and trauma-informed care.(2) The training standards of correctional officers who are designated as peace officers shall be not less than those established by the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 64-14-204 is amended to read:64-14-204. Supervision of sentenced offenders placed in community -- Rulemaking -- POST certified parole or probation officers and peace officers -- Duties -- Supervision fee -- Coordination with local mental health authority.(1)(a)The division, except as otherwise provided by law, shall supervise a sentenced offender placed in the community if the offender:(i)(A)is placed on probation by a court;(B)is released on parole by the Board of Pardons and Parole; or(C)is accepted for supervision under the terms of the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Parolees and Probationers; and(ii)has been convicted of:(A)a felony;(B)a class A misdemeanor when an element of the offense is the use or attempted use of physical force against an individual or property; or(C)notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B), a class A misdemeanor if the division is ordered by a court to supervise the offender under Section 77-18-105.(b)If a sentenced offender participates in substance use treatment or a residential vocational or life skills program, as defined in Section 13-53-102, while under supervision on probation or parole, the division shall monitor the offender's compliance with and completion of the treatment or program.(c)The department shall establish standards for:(i)the supervision of offenders in accordance with the adult sentencing and supervision length guidelines, as defined in Section 63M-7-401.1, giving priority, based on available resources, to felony offenders and offenders sentenced under Subsection 58-37-8 (2)(b)(ii); and(ii)the monitoring described in Subsection (1)(b).(2)The division shall apply the graduated and evidence-based responses established in the adult sentencing and supervision length guidelines, as defined in Section 63M-7-401.1, to facilitate a prompt and appropriate response to an individual's violation of the terms of probation or parole, including:(a)sanctions to be used in response to a violation of the terms of probation or parole; and(b)requesting approval from the court or Board of Pardons and Parole to impose a sanction for an individual's violation of the terms of probation or parole, for a period of incarceration of not more than three consecutive days and not more than a total of six days within a period of 30 days.(3)The division shall implement a program of graduated incentives as established in the adult sentencing and supervision length guidelines, as defined in Section 63M-7-401.1 to facilitate the department's prompt and appropriate response to an offender's:(a)compliance with the terms of probation or parole; or(b)positive conduct that exceeds those terms.(4)(a)The department shall, in collaboration with the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice and the Division of Substance Use and Mental Health, create standards and procedures for the collection of information, including cost savings related to recidivism reduction and the reduction in the number of inmates, related to the use of the graduated and evidence-based responses and graduated incentives, and offenders' outcomes.(b)The collected information shall be provided to the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice not less frequently than annually on or before August 31.(5)Employees of the division who are POST certified as law enforcement officers or correctional officers and who are designated as parole and probation officers by the executive director have the following duties:(a)monitoring, investigating, and supervising a parolee's or probationer's compliance with the conditions of the parole or probation agreement;(b)investigating or apprehending any offender who has escaped from the custody of the department or absconded from supervision by the division;(c)supervising any offender during transportation; or(d)collecting DNA specimens when the specimens are required under Section 53-10-404.(6)(a)(i)A monthly supervision fee of $30 shall be collected from each offender on probation or parole.(ii)The fee described in Subsection (6)(a)(i) may be suspended or waived by the division upon a showing by the offender that imposition would create a substantial hardship or if the offender owes restitution to a victim.(b)(i)The department shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, specifying the criteria for suspension or waiver of the supervision fee and the circumstances under which an offender may request a hearing.(ii)In determining whether the imposition of the supervision fee would constitute a substantial hardship, the division shall consider the financial resources of the offender and the burden that the fee would impose, with regard to the offender's other obligations.(c)The division shall deposit money received from the monthly supervision fee established in this Subsection (6) into the General Fund as a parole and probation dedicated credit to be used to cover costs incurred in the collection of the fee and in the development of offender supervision programs.(d)Upon the termination or expiration of an offender's sentence who is on probation or parole and has unpaid supervision fees, the department shall turn over the unpaid supervision fees to the Office of State Debt Collection.(7)(a)For offenders placed on probation under Section 77-18-105 or parole under Subsection 76-3-202(2)(a) on or after October 1, 2015, but before January 1, 2019, the division shall establish a program allowing an offender to earn a reduction credit of 30 days from the offender's period of probation or parole for each month the offender complies with the terms of the offender's probation or parole agreement, including the case action plan.(b)(i)For offenders placed on probation under Section 77-18-105 or parole under Section 76-3-202 on or after July 1, 2026, the division shall establish a program, consistent with the adult sentencing and supervision length guidelines, as defined in Section 63M-7-401.1, to provide incentives for an offender that maintains eligible employment, as defined in Section 64-13g-101.(ii)The program under Subsection (7)(b)(i) may include a credit towards the reduction of the length of supervision for an offender at a rate of up to 30 days for each month that the offender maintains eligible employment, as defined in Section 64-13g-101.(iii)A court, or the Board of Pardons and Parole, is not required to grant a request for termination of supervision under the program described in this Subsection (7)(b) if the court, or the Board of Pardons and Parole, finds that:(A)the offender presents a substantial risk to public safety;(B)termination would prevent the offender from completing risk reduction programming or treatment; or(C)the eligibility criteria for termination of supervision, as established in the adult sentencing and supervision length guidelines, as defined in Section 63M-7-401.1, have not been met.(iv)This Subsection (7)(b) does not prohibit the division, or another supervision services provider, from requesting termination of supervision based on the eligibility criteria in the adult sentencing and supervision length guidelines, as defined in Section 63M-7-401.1.(c)The division shall:(i)maintain a record of credits earned by an offender under this Subsection (7); and(ii)request from the court or the Board of Pardons and Parole the termination of probation or parole not fewer than 30 days prior to the termination date that reflects the credits earned under this Subsection (7).(d)This Subsection (7) does not prohibit the division from requesting a termination date earlier than the termination date established by earned credits under Subsection (7)(c).(e)The court or the Board of Pardons and Parole shall terminate an offender's probation or parole upon completion of the period of probation or parole accrued by time served and credits earned under this Subsection (7) unless the court or the Board of Pardons and Parole finds that termination would interrupt the completion of a necessary treatment program, in which case the termination of probation or parole shall occur when the treatment program is completed.(f)The department shall report annually to the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice on or before August 31:(i)the number of offenders who have earned probation or parole credits under this Subsection (7) in one or more months of the preceding fiscal year and the percentage of the offenders on probation or parole during that time that this number represents;(ii)the average number of credits earned by those offenders who earned credits;(iii)the number of offenders who earned credits by county of residence while on probation or parole;(iv)the cost savings associated with sentencing reform programs and practices; and(v)a description of how the savings will be invested in treatment and early-intervention programs and practices at the county and state levels.(8)(a)The department shall coordinate with a local mental health authority to complete the requirements of this Subsection (8) for an offender who:(i)is a habitual offender as that term is defined in Section 77-18-102;(ii)has a mental illness as that term is defined in Section 26B-5-301; and(iii)based on a risk and needs assessment:(A)is at a high risk of reoffending; and(B)has risk factors that may be addressed by available community-based services.(b)For an offender described in Subsection (8)(a), at any time clinically appropriate or at least three months before termination of an offender's parole or expiration of an offender's sentence, the department shall coordinate with the Department of Health and Human Services and the relevant local mental health authority to provide applicable clinical assessments and transitional treatment planning and services for the offender so that the offender may receive appropriate treatment and support services after the termination of parole or expiration of sentence.(c)The local mental health authority may determine whether the offender:(i)meets the criteria for civil commitment;(ii)meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment; or(iii)would benefit from assignment to an assertive community treatment team or available community-based services.(d)Based on the local mental health authority's determination under Subsection (8)(c), the local mental health authority shall, as appropriate:(i)initiate an involuntary commitment court proceeding;(ii)file a written application for assisted outpatient treatment; or(iii)seek to have the offender assigned to an assertive community treatment team or available community-based services.(e)On or before November 1, 2025, the department shall provide a report to the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee regarding any proposed changes to the requirements in this Subsection (8), including whether the requirements of this Subsection (8) should also apply to any other category of offenders.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 72-10-903 is amended to read:72-10-903. Unlawful operation of an unmanned aircraft near a correctional facility.(1)An individual may not operate an unmanned aircraft system:(a)to carry or drop any item to or inside the property of a correctional facility; or(b)in a manner that interferes with the operations or security of a correctional facility; or(c)to remove any item from inside the property of a correctional facility.(2)(a)A violation of Subsection (1)(a) or (c) is a third degree felony.(b)A violation of Subsection (1)(b) is a class B misdemeanor.(3)An operator of an unmanned aircraft system does not violate Subsection (1) if the operator is:(a)an employee or contractor working on behalf of a mosquito abatement district created pursuant to Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Special Districts, or Title 17D, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Other Entities; and(b)acting in the course and scope of the operator's employment.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 77-32b-102 is amended to read:77-32b-102. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Board" means the Board of Pardons and Parole.(2)(a)"Civil accounts receivable" means any amount of the criminal accounts receivable that is owed by the defendant that has not been paid on or before the day on which:(i)the defendant's sentence is terminated; or(ii)the court enters an order for a civil accounts receivable under Subsection 77-18-114(1) or (2).(b)"Civil accounts receivable" does not include any amount of the criminal accounts receivable that is owed by the defendant for restitution.(3)"Civil judgment of restitution" means any amount of the criminal accounts receivable that is owed by the defendant for restitution that has not been paid on or before the day on which the defendant's sentence is terminated.(4)(a)"Criminal accounts receivable" means any amount owed by a defendant that arises from a criminal judgment until:(i)the defendant's sentence terminates;(ii)the court enters an order for a civil accounts receivable under Subsection 77-18-114(1) or (2); or(iii)if the court requires the defendant, upon termination of the probation period for the defendant, to continue to make payments on the criminal accounts as described in Subsection 77-18-105(8), the defendant's sentence expires.(b)"Criminal accounts receivable" includes any unpaid:(i)fee, including the monthly supervision fee described in Subsection 64-14-204(6);(ii)forfeiture;(iii)surcharge;(iv)cost;(v)interest;(vi)penalty;(vii)restitution;(viii)third party claim;(ix)reimbursement of a reward; and(x)damages.(c)"Criminal accounts receivable" does not include any unpaid monthly supervision fee collected under Subsection 64-14-204(6) from an offender on probation or parole by the Division of Adult Probation and Parole created in Section 64-14-202.(5)"Default" means a civil accounts receivable, a civil judgment of restitution, or a criminal accounts receivable that is overdue by at least 90 days.(6)"Delinquent" means a civil accounts receivable, a civil judgment of restitution, or a criminal account receivable that is overdue by more than 28 days but less than 90 days.(7)"Payment schedule" means the amount that is be paid by a defendant in installments, or by a certain date, to satisfy a criminal accounts receivable for the defendant.(8)"Remit" or "remission" means to forgive or to excuse, in whole or in part, any unpaid amount of a criminal accounts receivable.(9)"Restitution" means the same as that term is defined in Section 77-38b-102.

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 77-38b-304 is amended to read:77-38b-304. Priority of payment disbursement.(1)The court, or the office, shall disburse a payment for restitution within 60 days after the day on which the payment is received from the defendant if:(a)the victim has complied with Subsection 77-38b-203(2);(b)if the defendant has tendered a negotiable instrument, funds from the financial institution are actually received;(c)the payment to the victim is at least $25, unless the payment is the final payment; and(d)there is no pending legal issue that would affect an order for restitution or the distribution of restitution.(2)The court shall disburse money collected from a defendant for a criminal accounts receivable in the following order of priority:(a)first, and except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), to restitution owed by the defendant in accordance with Subsection (4);(b)second, to the cost of obtaining a DNA specimen from the defendant as described in Subsection (4)(b);(c)third, to any criminal fine or surcharge owed by the defendant;(d)fourth, to the cost owed by the defendant for a reward described in Section 77-32b-104;(e)fifth, to the cost owed by the defendant for medical care, treatment, hospitalization, and related transportation paid by a county correctional facility under Section 17-63-706; and(f)sixth, to any other amount owed by the defendant.(3)When the office collects money from a defendant for a criminal accounts receivable, a civil accounts receivable, or a civil judgment of restitution, or past due monthly supervision fees under Subsection 64-14-204(6), the office shall disburse the money in the following order of priority:(a)first, to any past due amount owed to the department for the monthly supervision fee under Subsection 64-14-204(6);(b)second, and except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), to restitution owed by the defendant in accordance with Subsection (4);(c)third, to the cost of obtaining a DNA specimen from the defendant in accordance with Subsection (4)(b);(d)fourth, to any criminal fine or surcharge owed by the defendant;(e)fifth, to the cost owed by the defendant for a reward described in Section 77-32b-104;(f)sixth, to the cost owed by the defendant for medical care, treatment, hospitalization and related transportation paid by a county correctional facility under Section 17-63-706; and(g)seventh, to any other amount owed by the defendant.(4)(a)If a defendant owes restitution to more than one person or government agency at the same time, the court, or the office, shall disburse a payment for restitution in the following order of priority:(i)first, to the victim of the offense;(ii)second, to the Utah Office for Victims of Crime;(iii)third, any other government agency that has provided reimbursement to the victim as a result of the defendant's criminal conduct; and(iv)fourth, any insurance company that has provided reimbursement to the victim as a result of the defendant's criminal conduct.(b)If a defendant is required under Section 53-10-404 to reimburse the department for the cost of obtaining the defendant's DNA specimen, the reimbursement for the cost of obtaining the defendant's DNA specimen is the next priority after restitution to the victim of the offense under Subsection (4)(a)(i).(c)If a defendant is required to pay restitution to more than one victim, the court or the office shall disburse a payment for restitution proportionally to each victim.(5)Notwithstanding the requirements for the disbursement of a payment under Subsection (3) or (4), the office shall disburse money collected from a defendant to a debt that is a part of a civil accounts receivable or civil judgment of restitution if:(a)a defendant has provided a written request to the office to apply the payment to the debt; and(b)(i)the payment will eliminate the entire balance of the debt, including any interest; or(ii)after reaching a settlement, the payment amount will eliminate the entire agreed upon balance of the debt, including any interest.(6)For a criminal accounts receivable, the department shall collect the current and past due amount owed by a defendant for the monthly supervision fee under Subsection 64-14-204(6)(a) until the court enters a civil accounts receivable on the civil judgment docket under Section 77-18-114.(7)(6)Notwithstanding any other provision of this section:(a)the office may collect a fee, as described in Subsection 63A-3-502(4), from each payment for a criminal accounts receivable, a civil accounts receivable, or a civil judgment of restitution before disbursing the payment as described in this section; and(b)the office shall apply any payment collected through garnishment to the case for which the garnishment was issued.

Section 9:
Section 9.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.